New York, session 2025-2026, A238.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision c of section 60 of the general construction 2 law, as added by chapter 767 of the laws of 2005, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 c. The term "newspaper of a county, city, town or village" when used 5 in a statute shall mean a newspaper published, circulated, printed or 6 distributed in the county, city, town or village. Notwithstanding any 7 law to the contrary, in any case in which notice of any fact is required 8 by law to be published by or advertised in a newspaper, the term "news- 9 paper of a county, city, town or village" shall include, in addition to 10 its physical publication, any legal notice section maintained by such 11 newspaper or by one of its corporate subsidiaries on the newspaper's 12 website. Notice of any fact required by law to be published in a newspa- 13 per will be deemed sufficient if published in the form and for the dura- 14 tion required by law in such legal notice section of a newspaper's 15 website. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00818-01-5